test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-3lex_adelid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - adeliđ: # MLO, checked; 
    adeliđ+V+Inf: adeliđ
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adelâm
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: adelah
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: addel
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: adeleen
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: addelvettee
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: adelává
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: adelep
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: addelvetteđ
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: adeleh
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: adelim
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: adelih
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: adelij
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: adeláim
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: adeláid
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: adeláin
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: adelijm
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: adelijd
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: adelii
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: adeliččim
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: adeliččih
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: adeličij
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: adeliččijm
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: adeliččijd
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: adeliččijn
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: adeliččijm
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: adeliččijd
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: adeliččii
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: adeližžeem
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: adeližžeeh
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: adeliš
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: adeližžeen
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: adelišvettee
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: adeližává
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: adeližžep
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: adelišvetteđ
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: adeližeh

    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [adde, addel] # an exception, without -l
    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: adelus
    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: adeloon
    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: adelee
    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: adelus
    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: adelop
    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: adeliđ
    adeliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: adelus
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [adde, addel] # an exception, without -l
    adeliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: adelâm
    adeliđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: adeliččii
    adeliđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: adeližžii
    adeliđ+V+PrsPrc: [adeleijee, adelijjee]
    adeliđ+V+PrfPrc: adelâm
    adeliđ+V+Actio+Nom: adelem
    adeliđ+V+Actio+Ess: addelmin
    adeliđ+V+Actio+Loc: addelmist
    adeliđ+V+Actio+Ill: addelmân
    adeliđ+V+Actio+Com: addeldijn
    adeliđ+V+VAbess: addelhánnáá
